apertium-cat-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="parl/à__vblex">
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>èndu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>u</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>i</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>atu</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ata</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ati</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>à<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/ì__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ì</l><r>ì<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>icu</l><r>ì<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ici</l><r>ì<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ice</l><r>ì<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icemu</l><r>ì<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ite</l><r>ì<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icenu</l><r>ì<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="v/ulè__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ulè</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulendu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ogliu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oli</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ole</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulemu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulete</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>olenu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ulia</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulii</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulia</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uliamu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uliate</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulianu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>olsi</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulisti</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>olse</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>olsimu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uliste</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>olsenu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uleraghju</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulerai</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulerà</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uleremu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulerete</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uleranu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ulsutu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulsuta</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulsute</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulsuti</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cr/ede__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ede</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ergu</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>edi</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ede</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idemu</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idite</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>edenu</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idutu</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iduta</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idute</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iduti</l><r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/ene__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ene</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>engu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eni</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ene</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inemu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inite</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enenu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>enga</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enga</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enga</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>engamu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>engate</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enganu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>inutu</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inuta</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inute</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inuti</l><r>ene<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>






    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="dì"><i>d</i><par n="d/ì__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tene"><i>t</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vene"><i>v</i><par n="t/ene__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="crede"><i>cr</i><par n="cr/ede__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parlà"><i>parl</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="truvà"><i>truv</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aspittà"><i>aspitt</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cantà"><i>cant</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buscà"><i>busc</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunsiderà"><i>cunsider</i><par n="parl/à__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vulè"><i>v</i><par n="v/ulè__vblex"/></e>
